tests/needaf.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abcdefgxy
FLAG long
NEEDAFFIX ~~
SFX Ab Y 1
SFX Ab 0 b a
SFX Ac Y 1
SFX Ac 0 c/Ac [ac]
SFX Ad Y 1
SFX Ad 0 d/~~ [ad]
SFX Ae Y 1
SFX Ae 0 e/EfEg a
SFX Ef Y 1
SFX Ef 0 f e
SFX Eg Y 1
SFX Eg 0 g e
SFX Xa Y 1
SFX Xa 0 a/AbAcAdAe x
SFX Ya Y 1
SFX Ya 0 a/AbAcAdAe~~ y
